North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-21 Equipment of Vehicles
39-21-28.
Standards for lights on snow-removal or other hazardous equipment.

The director shall adopt standards and specifications applicable to headlamps, clearance lamps, identification and other lamps on snow-removal or other hazardous equipment when operated on the highways of this state in lieu of the lamps otherwise required on motor vehicles by this chapter. Such standards and specifications may permit the use of flashing lights for purposes of identification on snow-removal equipment when in service upon the highways. The standards and specifications for lamps referred to in this section must correlate with and, so far as possible, conform with those approved by the American association of state highway officials.

It is unlawful to operate any snow-removal equipment on any highway unless the lamps thereon comply with and are lighted when and as required by the standards and specifications adopted as provided in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-29.
Selling or using lamps or equipment.

No person may have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, pole trailer, or semitrailer, or use upon these vehicles any headlamp, auxiliary, or fog lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp, or required reflector, or parts of any of the foregoing which tend to change the original design or performance, unless of a type which has been approved by the department. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to equipment in actual use or replacement parts when this section is adopted.

No person may have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, pole trailer, or semitrailer any lamp or device mentioned in this section which has been approved by the department unless the lamp or device bears the trademark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed.

No person may use upon any motor vehicle, trailer, pole trailer, or semitrailer any lamps mentioned in this section unless the lamps are mounted, adjusted, and aimed in accordance with instructions of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1967, ch. 317, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 20.

39-21-30.
Authority of department.

The department may approve or disapprove any lighting devices or other safety equipment, component, or assembly, even though the device is of a type for which approval is not specifically required in this chapter. The department may issue and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for the approval of the lighting devices, safety equipment, components, or assemblies, their installation, adjustment and aiming, and adjustment when in use on motor vehicles. The regulations must correlate with and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current applicable standards and specifications of the society of automotive engineers.

The department shall approve or disapprove any lighting device or other safety equipment, component, or assembly, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this chapter, within a reasonable time after the device has been submitted.

The department may set up the procedure which must be followed when approval is sought for any lighting device or safety equipment, component, or assembly. The procedure may provide for submission of the device, equipment, component, or assembly to the American association of motor vehicle administrators, the society of automotive engineers, or other appropriate testing agency as the agent of the department and for the issuance of an approval certificate by the testing agency in the name of the department in lieu of submission of the device, equipment, component, or assembly to the department. Approval by the testing agency has the same force and effect as if it had been issued by the department.

The department upon approving any device, equipment, component, or assembly shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval together with any instructions determined by the department. The department shall maintain lists of all devices, components, or assemblies which it has approved.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1967, ch. 318, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 21.

39-21-30.1.
Duration of approval.

Approvals of lighting devices or other safety equipment, components, or assemblies remain valid unless revoked under section 39-21-31 or unless the department requires them to be renewed by regulation.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 431, § 23.

39-21-31.
Revocation of certificate of approval.

When the department has reason to believe that an approved lighting device or other safety equipment, component, or assembly being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, the department may, after giving thirty days’ previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the approved device. After the hearing, the department shall determine whether the approved device meets the requirements of this chapter. If the device does not meet the requirements of this chapter, the department shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the device in this state of its intention to revoke the approval.

If at the expiration of ninety days after notice the person holding the certificate of approval for the device has failed to satisfy the department that the approved device to be sold meets the requirements of this chapter, the department shall suspend or revoke the approval issued for the device. The department may require that devices sold after the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this chapter and shall require the withdrawal of those devices from the market.

When an approval has been suspended or revoked pursuant to this section, the device may not again be approved unless and until it has been submitted for approval and it has been demonstrated, in the same manner as in an application for an original approval, that the device meets the requirements of this chapter. The department may at the time of the retest purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of the approved devices, and if the device upon retest fails to meet the requirements of this chapter, the department may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of the device. The department may require that all previously approved devices be effectively recalled and removed from the market as a condition for reapproval.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 22.

39-21-32.
Brake equipment required.

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway must be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold such vehicle, including two separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means must be effective to apply the brakes to at least two wheels. If these two separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they must be so constructed that failure of any one part of the operating mechanism does not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two wheels.

Every farm tractor, motorcycle, and motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway, must be equipped with at least one brake, which may be operated by hand or foot.

Every trailer or semitrailer when operated upon a highway at a speed in excess of twenty-five miles [40.23 kilometers] per hour must be equipped with safety chains or brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and to hold such vehicle and so designed as to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab, and said brakes must be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle the brakes are automatically applied.

One of the means of brake operation must be parking brakes adequate to hold the vehicle on any grade on which it is operated, under all conditions of loading, on a surface free from snow, ice, or loose material. The parking brakes must be capable of being applied in conformance with the foregoing requirements by the driver’s muscular effort or by spring action or by equivalent means. Their operation may be assisted by the service brakes or other source of power provided that failure of the service brake actuation system or other power-assisting mechanism will not prevent the parking brakes from being applied in conformance with the foregoing requirements. The parking brakes must be so designed that when once applied they remain applied with the required effectiveness despite exhaustion of any source of energy or leakage of any kind. The same brakedrums, brakeshoes and lining assemblies, brakeshoe anchors, and mechanical brakeshoe actuation mechanism normally associated with the wheel brake assemblies may be used for both the service brakes and the parking brakes.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1967, ch. 319, § 1; 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

Cross-References.

Braking devices required on mobile homes, see § 39-18-04.

39-21-33.
Maintenance of brakes.

All brakes must be maintained in good working order and must be so adjusted as to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-34.
Brakes on motor-driven cycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 431, § 37.

39-21-35.
Hydraulic brake fluid.

The term “hydraulic brake fluid”, as used in this section, means the liquid medium through which force is transmitted to the brakes in the hydraulic brake system of a vehicle.

Hydraulic brake fluid must be distributed and serviced with due regard for the safety of the occupants of the vehicle and the public.

No person may distribute, have for sale, offer for sale, sell, or service any vehicle with any hydraulic brake fluid unless it has been approved by the department under the procedures set forth in section 39-21-30.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 24.

39-21-36.
Horn and warning device.

While being operated upon a highway, every motor vehicle must be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred feet [60.96 meters], but no horn or other warning device may emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle. Whenever reasonably necessary for safe operation, the driver of a motor vehicle upon a highway shall give audible warning with the vehicle’s horn, but may not otherwise use the vehicle’s horn while upon a highway.

No vehicle may be equipped with nor may any person use upon a vehicle any siren, whistle, or bell, except as otherwise permitted in this section.

Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.

Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] and of a type approved by the department, but the siren may not be used except when the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which events the driver of the vehicle shall sound the siren when reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of approaching vehicles.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1971, ch. 374, § 3; 1979, ch. 431, § 25.

Cross-References.

Motorcycle to be equipped with horn, see § 39-27-15.

39-21-37.
Muffler — Prevention of noise and smoke.

Every motor vehicle must at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order and in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise and annoying smoke, and no person may use a muffler cutout, bypass, or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a highway.

The engine and power mechanism of every motor vehicle must be so equipped and adjusted as to prevent the escape of excessive fumes or smoke.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-38.
Mirror.

On and after January 1, 1964, every motor vehicle, operated singly or when towing any other vehicle, must be equipped with a mirror so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet [60.96 meters] to the rear of such motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

Collateral References.

Operation of regulations requiring motor vehicles to be equipped with adequate mirrors, 27 A.L.R.2d 1040.

39-21-39.
Windshield — Must be unobstructed and equipped with wipers — Tinted windows.

A motor vehicle must be equipped with a windshield. An individual may not drive any motor vehicle with any sign, poster, or other nontransparent material upon the front windshield, side wings, or side or rear windows which obstructs the driver’s clear view of the highway or any intersecting highway.

The windshield on a motor vehicle must be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow, or other moisture from the windshield, which must be constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle.

The windshield wiper upon a motor vehicle must be maintained in good working order.

An individual may not operate a motor vehicle with any object, material, or tinting displayed, affixed, or applied on the front windshield or any window unless the object, material, or tinting in conjunction with the windshield upon which it is displayed, affixed, or applied has a light transmittance of at least seventy percent or the object, material, or tinting in conjunction with a window other than the windshield upon which it is displayed, affixed, or applied has a light transmittance of at least fifty percent. This subsection does not apply to windows behind the operator if the motor vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors on both sides that meet the requirements of section 39-21-38.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 26; 1983, ch. 445, § 1; 1989, ch. 480, § 1; 1989, ch. 481, § 1; 1989, ch. 482, § 1; 2003, ch. 333, § 1.

39-21-40.
Restrictions as to tire equipment.

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle must have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one inch [2.54 centimeters] thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

No person may operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block, stud, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible to use farm machinery with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway, and except also that it is permissible to use tire chains of reasonable proportions. It is also permissible to use, from October fifteenth to April fifteenth, pneumatic tires which have metal studs which do not project more than one-sixteenth of an inch [1.59 millimeters] beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible to use such tires on schoolbuses at any time during the year.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1965, ch. 263, § 2; 1967, ch. 320, § 1; 1979, ch. 432, § 1.

Collateral References.

Blowout or other failure of tire, liability of motor vehicle owner or operator for accident occasioned by, 24 A.L.R.2d 161.

Injuries to passengers from accident occasioned by blowout or other failure of tire, liability of motor carrier for, 44 A.L.R.2d 835.

39-21-41.
Safety glazing material in motor vehicles.

No person may sell any new motor vehicle, nor may any new motor vehicle be registered, unless it is equipped with safety glazing material of a type approved by the department wherever glazing material is used in doors, windows, and windshields. The foregoing provisions shall apply to all passenger-type motor vehicles, including passenger buses and schoolbuses, but in respect to trucks, including truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glazing material apply to all glazing material used in doors, windows, and windshields in the drivers’ compartment.

The term “safety glazing materials” means glazing materials so constructed, treated, or combined with other materials as to reduce substantially, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass, the likelihood of injury to persons by objects from exterior sources or by these safety glazing materials when they may be cracked or broken.

The department shall maintain a list of types of glazing material by name approved by it as meeting the requirements of this section and may not register after January 1, 1964, any motor vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this section unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety glazing material, and it shall thereafter suspend the registration of any motor vehicle subject to this section which it finds is not equipped until it is made to conform to the requirements of this section. The requirements of this section do not apply to antique automobiles licensed under chapter 39-04.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 27.

39-21-41.1.
Safety belts.

Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1965, must be equipped with lapbelt assemblies for use in the driver’s and one other front seating position.

All motor vehicles manufactured after January 1, 1968, must be equipped with any lapbelt or shoulder belt required at the time the vehicle was manufactured by standards of the United States department of transportation. Nothing in this subsection affects the requirement in subsection 1 for a lapbelt in the driver’s seating position.

The department may except specified types of motor vehicles or seating positions within any motor vehicle from the requirements imposed by subsections 1 and 2 when compliance would be impractical.

No person may install, distribute, have for sale, offer for sale, or sell any belt for use in motor vehicles unless it meets current minimum standards and specifications of the United States department of transportation.

Every owner shall maintain belts and assemblies required by this section in proper condition and in a manner that will enable occupants to use them.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 283, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 28.

Collateral References.

Liability under state law for injuries resulting from defective automobile seatbelt, shoulder harness, or restraint system, 48 A.L.R.5th 1.

39-21-41.2.
Child restraint devices — Evidence.

If a child, under eight years of age, is present in a motor vehicle, that motor vehicle must be equipped with at least one child restraint system for the child. However, a child under the age of eight who is at least fifty-seven inches [1.45 meters] tall is not required to use a child restraint system, but must be correctly buckled in a safety belt. The child restraint system must meet the standards adopted by the United States department of transportation for those systems [49 CFR 571.213]. While the motor vehicle is in motion, the child must be properly secured in the child restraint system in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions. While the motor vehicle is moving, each child of eight through seventeen years of age who is in the motor vehicle must be in an approved child restraint system in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions or correctly buckled in a safety belt. Use of child restraint systems and safety belts is not required in motor vehicles that were not equipped with safety belts when manufactured. If a child is being transported in an emergency situation, this section does not apply.

Violation of this section is not, in itself, evidence of negligence. The fact of a violation of this section is not admissible in any proceeding other than one charging the violation.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 446, § 1; 1985, ch. 444, § 1; 1987, ch. 482, § 1; 1991, ch. 431, § 1; 1991, ch. 432, § 1; 1999, ch. 344, § 3; 2005, ch. 340, § 6; 2017, ch. 274, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

Failure to use or misuse of automobile child safety seat or restraint system as affecting recovery for personal injury or death, 46 A.L.R.5th 557.

39-21-41.3.
Use of safety belts required in certain motor vehicles — Enforcement. [Repealed]

Deleted by R.M. December 5, 1989.

Note.

Section 39-21-41.3 was enacted by S.L. 1989, ch. 464, section 2, and disapproved by R.M. December 5, 1989.

39-21-41.4.
Use of safety belts required in certain motor vehicles — Enforcement — Evidence.

Subject to the limitations of this section and section 39-21-41.5, a driver may not operate upon a highway a motor vehicle designed for carrying fewer than eleven passengers, which was originally manufactured with safety belts unless each front seat occupant is wearing a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt. This section does not apply to a child in a child restraint or safety belt in accordance with section 39-21-41.2; to drivers of implements of husbandry; to operators of farm vehicles as defined in subsection 5 of section 39-04-19; to rural mail carriers while on duty delivering mail; to an occupant with a medical or physically disabling condition that prevents appropriate restraint in a safety belt, if a qualified physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse states in a signed writing the nature of the condition and the reason restraint is inappropriate; or when all front seat safety belts are in use by other occupants. A physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who, in good faith, provides a statement that restraint would be inappropriate is not subject to civil liability. A violation for not wearing a safety belt under this section is not, in itself, evidence of negligence. The fact of a violation of this section is not admissible in any proceeding other than one charging the violation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 385, § 2; 1995, ch. 384, § 1; 2003, ch. 334, § 1; 2017, ch. 274, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Chapter 385, S.L. 1993, which enacted this section, was referred and approved on June 14, 1994, at the primary election, and became effective July 14, 1994, under N.D. Const., Art. III, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Note: North Dakota’s Seat Belt Defense: It’s Time For North Dakota To Statutorily Adopt the Doctrine of Avoidable Consequences, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 139 (2011).

39-21-41.5.
Secondary enforcement.

A peace officer may not issue a citation for a violation of section 39-21-41.4 unless the officer lawfully stopped or detained the driver of the motor vehicle for another violation. Drivers’ license points may not be assessed against any person for violation of section 39-21-41.4.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 385, § 3.

Note.

Chapter 385, S.L. 1993, which enacted this section, was referred and approved on June 14, 1994, at the primary election, and became effective July 14, 1994, under N.D. Const., Art. III, § 8.

39-21-42.
Certain vehicles to carry flares or other warning devices.

No person may operate any motor truck, passenger bus, or truck tractor, or any motor vehicle towing a housetrailer, upon any highway outside the corporate limits of municipalities at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise unless there is carried in the vehicle the following equipment except as provided in subsection 2:

At least three flares or three red electric lanterns or three portable red emergency reflectors, each of which must be capable of being seen and distinguished at a distance of not less than six hundred feet [182.88 meters] under normal atmospheric conditions at nighttime. No flare, fusee, electric lantern, or cloth warning flag may be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless it is of a type which has been submitted to the department and approved by it. No portable reflector unit may be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless it meets the requirements of the national highway traffic safety administration motor vehicle safety standard number 125 or unless it is so designed and constructed as to include two reflecting elements one above the other, each of which must be capable of reflecting red light clearly visible from all distances within six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to one hundred feet [30.48 meters] under normal atmospheric conditions at night when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps, and unless it is of a type which has been submitted to the department and approved by it.

At least three red-burning fusees unless red electric lanterns or red portable emergency reflectors are carried.

At least two red-cloth flags, not less than twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] square, with standards to support such flags.

No person may operate at the time and under conditions stated in subsection 1 any motor vehicle used for the transportation of explosives, any cargo tank truck used for the transportation of flammable liquids or compressed gases, or any motor vehicle using compressed gas as a fuel unless there is carried in the vehicle three red electric lanterns or three portable red emergency reflectors meeting the requirements of subsection 1, and there shall not be carried in the vehicle any flare, fusee, or signal produced by flame.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1975, ch. 361, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 29.

39-21-43.
Display of warning devices when vehicle disabled.

Whenever any truck, bus, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer eighty inches [20.32 decimeters] or more in overall width or thirty feet [91.44 decimeters] or more in overall length is stopped upon a roadway or adjacent shoulder, the driver shall immediately actuate vehicular hazard warning signal lamps meeting the requirements of this chapter. The lamps need not be displayed by a vehicle parked lawfully in an urban district, or stopped lawfully to receive or discharge passengers, or stopped to avoid conflict with other traffic or to comply with the directions of a police officer or an official traffic-control device, or while the devices specified in subsections 2 through 8 are in place.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in subsection 1 is disabled, or stopped for more than ten minutes, upon a roadway outside of an urban district at any time when lighted lamps are required, the driver of the vehicle shall display the following warning devices except as provided in subsection 3:

A lighted fusee, a lighted red electric lantern, or a portable red emergency reflector must immediately be placed at the traffic side of the vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic.

As soon thereafter as possible but in any event within the burning period of the fusee (fifteen minutes), the driver shall place three liquid-burning flares (pot torches), or three lighted red electric lanterns, or three portable red emergency reflectors on the roadway in the following order:

One, approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from the disabled vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and toward traffic approaching in that lane.

One, approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] in the opposite direction from the disabled vehicle and in the center of the traffic lane occupied by such vehicle.

One at the traffic side of the disabled vehicle not less than ten feet [30.48 decimeters] rearward or forward thereof in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic. If a lighted red electric lantern or a red portable emergency reflector has been placed at the traffic side of the vehicle in accordance with paragraph 1, it may be used for this purpose.

Whenever any vehicle referred to in this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten minutes, within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of a curve, hillcrest, or other obstruction to view, the warning device in the direction must be so placed as to afford ample warning to other users of the highway, but in no case less than one hundred feet [30.48 meters] nor more than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] from the disabled vehicle.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten minutes, upon any roadway of a divided highway during the time lighted lamps are required, the appropriate warning devices prescribed in subsections 2 and 3 must be placed as follows: one at a distance of approximately two hundred feet [60.96 meters] from the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the stopped vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane; one at a distance of approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from the vehicle, in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane; one at the traffic side of the vehicle and approximately ten feet [30.48 decimeters] from the vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic.

Whenever any motor vehicle used in the transportation of explosives or any cargo tank truck used for the transportation of any flammable liquid or compressed gas is disabled, or stopped for more than ten minutes, at any time and place mentioned in subsection 2, 3, or 4, the driver of the vehicle shall immediately display red electric lanterns or portable red emergency reflectors in the same number and manner specified in subsection 2, 3, or 4. Flares, fusees, or signals produced by flame may not be used as warning devices for vehicles of the type mentioned in this subsection nor for vehicles using compressed gas as a fuel.

The warning devices described in subsections 2 through 5 need not be displayed where there is sufficient light to reveal persons and vehicles within a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters].

Whenever any vehicle described in this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten minutes, upon a roadway outside of an urban district or upon the roadway of a divided highway at any time when lighted lamps are not required by section 39-21-01 the driver of the vehicle shall display two red flags as follows:

If traffic on the roadway moves in two directions, one flag shall be placed approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to the rear and one flag approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] in advance of the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle.

Upon a one-way roadway, one flag must be placed approximately one hundred feet [30.48 meters] and one flag approximately two hundred feet [60.96 meters] to the rear of the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle.

When any vehicle described in this section is stopped entirely off the roadway and on an adjacent shoulder at any time and place mentioned in this section, the warning devices must be placed, as nearly as practicable, on the shoulder near the edge of the roadway.

The flares, fusees, red electric lanterns, portable red emergency reflectors, and flags to be displayed as required in this section must conform with the applicable requirements of section 39-21-42.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 30.

Collateral References.

Negligence or contributory negligence of driver or occupant of motor vehicle parked or stopped on highway without flares, 67 A.L.R.2d 12.

Liability of motorist engaged about stalled or disabled vehicle on or near highway, 27 A.L.R.3d 12.

39-21-44.
Vehicle transporting explosives or hazardous materials — Administrative procedure and judicial review.

Any person operating any vehicle transporting any explosive or hazardous material as a cargo or part of a cargo upon a highway shall comply with this section.

The vehicle must be equipped with at least one fire extinguisher, filled and ready for immediate use, and placed at a convenient point on the vehicle.

The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall adopt rules for the safe transportation of hazardous materials. Rules must duplicate or be consistent with current hazardous materials regulations of the United States department of transportation. The superintendent of the state highway patrol may adopt the hazardous materials regulations by reference and any adoption must be construed to incorporate amendments as may be made from time to time.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 31; 1981, ch. 336, § 23; 1983, ch. 447, § 1; 1995, ch. 385, § 1; 1997, ch. 339, § 2.

39-21-44.1.
Vehicle to be constructed to prevent sifting or leaking loads.

No vehicle may be driven or moved on any highway unless it is so constructed or loaded as to prevent its contents from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction, or water or other substance may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining the roadway. No person may operate on any highway any vehicle with any load unless the load and any covering thereon is securely fastened so as to prevent said covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a hazard to other users of the highway.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-44.2.
Drawbar or connection between vehicles — Precautions required.

The drawbar or other coupling device between vehicles, one of which is towing or drawing the other on a highway, must include safety chains connecting the vehicles. The drawbar or other coupling device, and the safety chains, must be of a design, strength, and construction so as to prevent the unintentional uncoupling of the vehicles. The safety chain requirement of this section does not apply to:

A fifth-wheel coupling device; or

A vehicle towing an implement of husbandry or an implement of husbandry towing a vehicle, when operated at a speed not exceeding twenty-five miles [40.23 kilometers] per hour.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1985, ch. 445, § 1; 1993, ch. 396, § 2.

39-21-45.
Air-conditioning equipment.

The term “air-conditioning equipment”, as used or referred to in this section, means mechanical vapor compression refrigeration equipment which is used to cool the driver’s or passenger compartment of any motor vehicle.

Air-conditioning equipment must be manufactured, installed, and maintained with due regard for the safety of the occupants of the vehicle and the public and may not contain any refrigerant which is toxic to persons or which is flammable, unless the refrigerant is included in the list published by the United States environmental protection agency as a safe alternative motor vehicle air-conditioning substitute for chlorofluorocarbon-12, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 7671k(c).

The department may adopt and enforce safety requirements, rules, and specifications consistent with the requirements of this section applicable to equipment which must correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the current recommended practice or standard applicable to air-conditioning equipment approved by the society of automotive engineers.

No person may have for sale, offer for sale, sell, or equip any motor vehicle with any air-conditioning equipment unless it complies with the requirements of this section.

No person may operate on any highway any motor vehicle equipped with any air-conditioning equipment unless the equipment complies with the requirements of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 32; 2011, ch. 290, § 1.

39-21-45.1.
Modification of motor vehicle.

An individual who operates a registered motor vehicle on a highway may not modify that vehicle unless the modification meets the following requirements:

Any modifying equipment must meet any other requirement applicable to a vehicle under chapter 39-21.

If tires placed on a motor vehicle have a diameter greater than that of the tires on the motor vehicle as manufactured, those tires must be branded with a United States department of transportation tire identification number.

The maximum body height permitted for a motor vehicle is forty-two inches [106.68 centimeters]. Measurement of body height is made from a level ground surface to the floor of the cargo area.

An individual may not operate a registered motor vehicle on a highway unless the motor vehicle is equipped with front and rear bumpers. The height of the bumper must not exceed twenty-seven inches [68.58 centimeters] and this measurement is made from a level ground surface to the highest point on the bottom of the bumper. A horizontal drop bumper may be used to comply with this subsection and must be at least three inches [7.62 centimeters] in vertical width; extend the entire horizontal body width; and be horizontal, load bearing, and attached to the vehicle frame to effectively transfer impact when engaged.

Vehicles owned by law enforcement agencies, the military, firefighting agencies, and ambulances may be modified without regard to this section.

The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 1; 1975, ch. 362, § 1; 1985, ch. 431, § 2; 2015, ch. 264, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 264, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Law Reviews.

Viewpoint: Atwater in North Dakota: Soccer Moms Beware, Sometimes, 78 N.D. L. Rev. 467 (2002).